Utah statutes.
17-19-19.   Budget officer -- Departmental revenue and expenditure reports.
(1) (a)  Subject to Subsection (1)(b), the budget officer of a county is:
(i)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(a)(ii), the county auditor; or
(ii)  in a county in which the functions of clerk and auditor are combined,
the county clerk.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a), if a county has adopted an optional
plan, as defined in Section 17-52-101, that provides for the county executive
to be the county budget officer, the county budget officer is the county
executive.
(2)  Each department for which county funds are appropriated shall file with
the county budget officer not less than three months before the commencement
of each fiscal year on forms furnished by the county budget officer a detailed
estimate and statement of the revenue and necessary expenditures of the
department for the next budget year. The estimate and statement shall set
forth the number of persons to be regularly employed; the kinds of service to
be performed, the salaries and wages to be paid, the kind of work to be
performed and the improvements to be made together with the estimated cost of
the service, work and improvements. The statement shall also record
performance data expressed in work units, unit costs, man hours, and man years
sufficient in detail, content, and scope to permit the county budget officer
to prepare and process the county budget.
(3)  In the preparation of the budget, the county budget officer and all other
county officers are subject to Sections 17-36-1 to 17-36-44 and to the uniform
system of budgeting, accounting, and reporting established pursuant thereto.
